Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 17. Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan Fund.

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 58, SLA 2012, makes this article effective June 7, 2012, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 44.33.950.
Alaska microloan revolving loan fund.

The Alaska microloan revolving loan fund is created in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to carry out the purposes of AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

.

The Alaska microloan revolving loan fund consists of the following:

money appropriated to, transferred to, or received by gift, grant, devise, bequest, or donation to the fund;

principal and interest payments or other income earned on loans or investments of the fund;

money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring a “report to the legislature on the activity, effectiveness, and suggestions for improvement of the Alaska microloan revolving loan fund” established under this section, see sec. 3, ch. 102, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.33.955.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department may

make loans to eligible applicants under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

to be used for working capital, equipment, construction, or other commercial purposes by a business located in the state;

receive, take, hold, and administer any appropriation, transfer, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or donation of money for the fund;

establish amortization plans for repayment of loans, including extensions of the terms of loans;

allow an assumption of a loan if

the applicant meets the requirements established under this section; and

approval of the assumption would be consistent with the purposes of AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

;

establish the rate of interest for loans consistent with law;

charge and collect fees for services provided under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided; and

designate agents and delegate powers as necessary to the agents.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.33.960.
Eligibility.

For an applicant to be eligible for a loan under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

, the applicant shall

be a resident of the state, as determined under (b) of this section;

provide a reasonable amount of money from other nonstate sources for use on any project or enterprise for which money from a loan will be used; and

if the requested loan amount is more than $35,000, provide to the department a document from a state financial institution stating that

the applicant has been denied a loan for the same purpose; or

a loan from the financial institution is contingent on the applicant also receiving a loan from the fund.

To meet the residency requirements of (a) of this section, the applicant

shall physically reside in this state and maintain a domicile in this state during the 12 consecutive months preceding the date of application for the program; and

may not have

declared or established residency in another state; or

received residency or a benefit based on residency from another state.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 amendment to subsection (a) applies “to applications for loans under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

made on or after December 4, 2018”, see sec. 4, ch. 102, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

The 2018 amendment, effective December 4, 2018, in (a)(3), substituted “is more than $35,000” for “is $35,000 or more” following “requested loan amount”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 102, SLA 2018 (HB 304), which amended subsection (a), see 2018 House Journal 2240 — 2241.

Sec. 44.33.965.
Limitations on loans.

The department may use money from the Alaska microloan revolving loan fund to make loans of up to $35,000 to a person or loans of up to $70,000 to two or more persons.

A loan under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

may not exceed a term of 12 years, except for extensions under AS

44.33.955

;

may not bear interest at a rate greater than the prime rate, as defined in AS

44.88.599

, plus two percentage points, but that may not be less than four percent a year or more than eight percent a year;

must be secured by collateral acceptable to the commissioner; and

may not be made to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 amendment to subsection (b) applies “to applications for loans under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

made on or after December 4, 2018”, see sec. 4, ch. 102, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

The 2018 amendment, effective December 4, 2018, in (b)(1) substituted “term of 12 years” for “term of six years” following “may not exceed a” at the beginning, in (b)(2), substituted “plus two percentage points” for “plus one percentage point” following “defined in AS

44.88.599

,” substituted “less than four percent” for “less than six percent” following “may not be”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 102, SLA 2018 (HB 304), which amended subsection (b), see 2018 House Journal 2240 — 2241.

Sec. 44.33.970.
Special account established.

The foreclosure expense account is established as a special account in the Alaska microloan revolving loan fund.

The department may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans granted under AS

44.33.960

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after an obligor defaults.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.33.975.
Default.

If the borrower defaults on a note, the department shall notify the borrower of the default and the consequences of default by mailing a notice to the borrower’s most recent address provided to the department by the borrower or obtained by the department.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.33.980.
Disposal of property acquired after default.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default of a loan made under AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

. Disposal must be made in a manner that serves the best interest of the state and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 44.33.990.
Definitions.

In AS

44.33.950

—

44.33.990

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 2012)